Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1417
Trip permit or payment of motor fuels taxes; required; violation; penalty.

No person shall bring into this state in the fuel supply tanks of a qualified motor vehicle or in any other container, regardless of whether or not the supply tanks are connected to the motor of the vehicle, any motor fuels to be used in the operation of the vehicle in this state unless he or she has purchased a trip permit pursuant to section 66-1418 or paid or made arrangements in advance for payment of Nebraska motor fuels taxes on the gallonage consumed in operating the vehicle in this state.

Any person who brings into this state in the fuel supply tanks of a qualified motor vehicle motor fuels in violation of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act shall be subject to an administrative penalty of one hundred dollars for each violation to be assessed and collected by the department or another state agency which may be contracted with to act as the department's agent for such purpose. All such penalties collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 62.